Missouri, session 2026, HB1623.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 324 and 331, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 324.263 and 331.084, to read as follows:
324.263. 1. The board may apply to the administrative hearing commission for
an emergency suspension or restriction of a license issued under sections 324.240 to
324.275 if:
(1) The holder of the license is the subject of a pending criminal indictment,
criminal information, or other criminal charge related to the duties and responsibilities
of the licensed occupation; and
(2) There is reasonable cause for the board to believe that the public health,
safety, or welfare is at imminent risk of harm from the holder of the license.
2. The board shall submit to the administrative hearing commission supporting
affidavits and certified court records, together with a complaint alleging the facts in
support of the board's request for an emergency suspension or restriction of a license,
and shall supply the administrative hearing commission with the last home or business
addresses on file with the board for the licensee. Within one business day of the filing of
the complaint, the administrative hearing commission shall return a service packet to
the board. The service packet shall include the board's complaint and any affidavits or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1623 2
records the board intends to rely on that have been filed with the administrative hearing
commission. The service packet may contain other information in the discretion of the
administrative hearing commission. Within twenty-four hours of receiving the packet,
the board shall either personally serve the licensee the service packet or leave a copy of
the service packet at all of the licensee's current addresses on file with the board.
3. Within five days of the board's filing of the complaint, the administrative
hearing commission shall review the information submitted by the board and shall issue
its findings of fact and conclusions of law. If the administrative hearing commission
finds that there is reasonable cause for the board to believe that the public health, safety,
or welfare is at imminent risk of harm from the holder of the license, the administrative
hearing commission shall enter the order requested by the board. The order shall be
effective upon personal service or by leaving a copy at all of the licensee's current
addresses on file with the board.
4. (1) The administrative hearing commission shall hold an evidentiary hearing
on the record within forty-five days of the board's filing of the complaint, or upon final
adjudication of any criminal charges filed against the licensee, as appropriate, to
determine if cause for discipline exists under the provisions of sections 324.240 to
324.275 and to determine whether the initial order entered by the commission shall
continue in effect. Prior to the hearing, the licensee may file affidavits and certified
court records for consideration by the administrative hearing commission. The
administrative hearing commission may grant a request for a continuance but shall in
any event hold the hearing within one hundred twenty days of the board's initial filing.
The board shall be granted leave to amend its complaint if it is more than thirty days
prior to the hearing, or within thirty days prior to the hearing upon a showing of good
cause.
(2) If no cause for discipline is found following an evidentiary hearing, the
administrative hearing commission shall issue findings of fact, conclusions of law, and
an order terminating the commission's initial order imposing an emergency suspension
or restriction of the license.
(3) If the administrative hearing commission finds cause for discipline following
an evidentiary hearing, the commission shall issue findings of fact and conclusions of
law and order the emergency suspension or restriction to remain in full force and effect
pending a disciplinary hearing before the board. The board shall hold a hearing
following the certification of the record by the administrative hearing commission and
may impose discipline otherwise authorized by state law.

HB 1623 3
5. Any action under this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any
discipline otherwise in the board's power to impose and may be brought concurrently
with other actions.
6. If the administrative hearing commission does not grant an initial order
imposing an emergency suspension or restriction of the license as described in
subsection 3 of this section, the board shall remove all reference to such emergency
suspension or restriction from its public records.
331.084. 1. The board may apply to the administrative hearing commission for
an emergency suspension or restriction of a license issued under this chapter if:
(1) The holder of the license is the subject of a pending criminal indictment,
criminal information, or other criminal charge related to the duties and responsibilities
of the licensed occupation; and
(2) There is reasonable cause for the board to believe that the public health,
safety, or welfare is at imminent risk of harm from the holder of the license.
2. The board shall submit to the administrative hearing commission supporting
affidavits and certified court records, together with a complaint alleging the facts in
support of the board's request for an emergency suspension or restriction of a license,
and shall supply the administrative hearing commission with the last home or business
addresses on file with the board for the licensee. Within one business day of the filing of
the complaint, the administrative hearing commission shall return a service packet to
the board. The service packet shall include the board's complaint and any affidavits or
records the board intends to rely on that have been filed with the administrative hearing
commission. The service packet may contain other information in the discretion of the
administrative hearing commission. Within twenty-four hours of receiving the packet,
the board shall either personally serve the licensee the service packet or leave a copy of
the service packet at all of the licensee's current addresses on file with the board.
3. Within five days of the board's filing of the complaint, the administrative
hearing commission shall review the information submitted by the board and shall issue
its findings of fact and conclusions of law. If the administrative hearing commission
finds that there is reasonable cause for the board to believe that the public health, safety,
or welfare is at imminent risk of harm from the holder of the license, the administrative
hearing commission shall enter the order requested by the board. The order shall be
effective upon personal service or by leaving a copy at all of the licensee's current
addresses on file with the board.
4. (1) The administrative hearing commission shall hold an evidentiary hearing
on the record within forty-five days of the board's filing of the complaint, or upon final
adjudication of any criminal charges filed against the licensee, as appropriate, to

HB 1623 4
determine if cause for discipline exists under the provisions of this chapter and to
determine whether the initial order entered by the commission shall continue in effect.
Prior to the hearing, the licensee may file affidavits and certified court records for
consideration by the administrative hearing commission. The administrative hearing
commission may grant a request for a continuance but shall in any event hold the
hearing within one hundred twenty days of the board's initial filing. The board shall be
granted leave to amend its complaint if it is more than thirty days prior to the hearing,
or within thirty days prior to the hearing upon a showing of good cause.
(2) If no cause for discipline is found following an evidentiary hearing, the
administrative hearing commission shall issue findings of fact, conclusions of law, and
an order terminating the commission's initial order imposing an emergency suspension
or restriction of the license.
(3) If the administrative hearing commission finds cause for discipline following
an evidentiary hearing, the commission shall issue findings of fact and conclusions of
law and order the emergency suspension or restriction to remain in full force and effect
pending a disciplinary hearing before the board. The board shall hold a hearing
following the certification of the record by the administrative hearing commission and
may impose discipline otherwise authorized by state law.
5. Any action under this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any
discipline otherwise in the board's power to impose and may be brought concurrently
with other actions.
6. If the administrative hearing commission does not grant an initial order
imposing an emergency suspension or restriction of the license as described in
subsection 3 of this section, the board shall remove all reference to such emergency
suspension or restriction from its public records.
✔